Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1828
Authority; receive loans, grants, and contributions.

The authority may receive and accept from any source loans or grants for or in aid of the construction of a project or any portion thereof, and receive and accept from any source loans, grants, aid, or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purpose for which such loans, grants, aid, or contributions are made.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 28.